California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 1411)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Collection of Amounts Imposed by a Court [19280. - 19283.]

19280.

(a) (1) (A) Fines, monetary sanctions, state or local penalties, bail, forfeitures, restitution fines, restitution orders, or any other amounts imposed by a juvenile or superior court of the State of California or the Supreme Court of the State of California upon a person or any other entity, or any payment from the State Bar of California’s Client Security Fund that is part of a final determination from the Client Security Fund, that are due and payable in an amount totaling no less than one hundred dollars ($100), in the aggregate, for criminal offenses, including all offenses involving a violation of the Vehicle Code, any amounts due pursuant to Section 903.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and any amounts due pursuant to Section 6086.10, 6086.13, or 6140.5 of the Business and
 Professions Code may, no sooner than 90 days after payment of that amount becomes delinquent, be referred by the juvenile or superior court, the county, the state, or the State Bar to the Franchise Tax Board for collection under guidelines prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. Except as specified in subparagraph (B), the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or county may refer a restitution order to the Franchise Tax Board, in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), for any person subject to the restitution order who is or has been under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the county.

(B) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the county shall not refer a restitution order to the Franchise Tax Board if a county agency has been designated by the county board of supervisors to collect restitution from individuals who (i) are serving a sentence in a county jail pursuant to
 subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, (ii) are on mandatory supervision pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or (iii) are on postrelease community supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450) of Part 3 of the Penal Code, the designated county agency has an existing collection system and objects to collection by the Franchise Tax Board, and the designated county agency informs the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the county that it will collect the restitution order.

(C) If the crime victim entitled to restitution in the order notifies either the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the designated county agency with regard to their preference of a collecting agency, that preference shall be honored and the collection shall be performed in accordance with the preference of the victim.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) The amounts referred by the juvenile or superior court, the county, the state, or the State Bar under this section may include an administrative fee and any amounts that a government entity may add to the court-imposed obligation as a result of the underlying offense, trial, or conviction. For purposes of this article, those amounts shall be deemed to be imposed by the court.

(B) Restitution orders may be referred to the Franchise Tax Board only by a government entity, as agreed upon by the Franchise Tax Board, provided that all of the following apply:

(i) The government entity has the authority to collect on behalf of the state or the victim.

(ii) The government entity shall be responsible for
 distributing the restitution order collections, as appropriate.

(iii) The government entity shall ensure, in making the referrals and distributions, that it coordinates with any other related collection activities that may occur by superior courts, counties, or other state agencies.

(iv) The government entity shall ensure compliance with laws relating to the reimbursement of the Restitution Fund.

(C) The Franchise Tax Board shall establish criteria for referral that shall include setting forth a minimum dollar amount subject to referral and collection.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board, in conjunction with the Judicial Council, shall seek whatever additional resources are needed to accept referrals from all 58 counties or superior courts.

(c) Upon written notice to the debtor from the Franchise Tax Board, any amount referred to the Franchise Tax Board under subdivision (a) and any interest thereon, including any interest on the amount referred under subdivision (a) that accrued prior to the date of referral, shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California, and shall be collected from the debtor by the Franchise Tax Board in any manner authorized under the law for collection of a delinquent personal income tax liability, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order and levy under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for earnings withholding orders for taxes.

(d) (1) Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001),
 and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall apply to amounts referred under this article in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if the language of those laws had been incorporated in full into this article, except to the extent that any provision is either inconsistent with this article or is not relevant to this article.

(2) Any information, information sources, or enforcement remedies and capabilities available to the court or the state referring to the amount due described in subdivision (a) shall be available to the Franchise Tax Board to be used in conjunction with, or independent of, the information, information sources, or remedies and capabilities available to the Franchise Tax Board for purposes of administering Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(e) The activities required to implement and administer this part shall not interfere with the primary mission of the Franchise Tax Board to administer Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(f) For amounts referred for collection under subdivision (a), interest shall accrue at the greater of the rate applicable to the amount due being collected or the rate provided under Section 19521. When notice of the amount due includes interest and is mailed to the debtor and the amount is paid within 15 days after the date of notice, interest shall not be imposed for the period after the date of notice.

(g) A collection under this article is not a payment of income taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(h) (1) Both of the following shall apply to any levy or order issued on or after January 1, 2022, under subdivision (c):

(A) The maximum amount of disposable earnings of a debtor for any workweek that is subject to collection shall not exceed the amount specified in Section 706.050 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(B) The minimum basic standard of care amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 704.220 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall not be subject to collection.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to restitution orders or restitution fines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 256, Sec. 16.   (AB 176)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19281.

(a) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the program authorized by this part be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criteria, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board or Controller in implementing and administering the program required by this article.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), any standard, criteria, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline that otherwise would be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall be approved by a majority vote of the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1242, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19282.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (e), amounts collected under this article shall be transmitted to the Treasurer and deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Court Collection Account in the General Fund, which is hereby created. Amounts deposited in the Court Collection Account shall, less an amount that is equal to the costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board in administering the program authorized by this article, be transferred by the Controller either to the county or to the state fund to which the amount due was originally owing or as otherwise directed by contractual agreement. If the amount collected is not sufficient to satisfy the amounts referred for collection pursuant to Section 19280 that are to be paid by an offender, then the amount paid shall be allocated for distribution on a pro
 rata basis, as defined in subdivision (d), except in counties where the board of supervisors has established a priority of payment for amounts collected under this article pursuant to Section 1203.1d of the Penal Code. The amount that is equal to the costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board in administering the program authorized by this article shall be transferred by the Controller to the General Fund for the purpose of recovering the amount expended by the Franchise Tax Board from General Fund appropriations for the purpose of implementing and administering the program authorized by this article, and related statutes as added or amended by the act adding this article.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that costs to the Franchise Tax Board to administer this article for the 2025–26 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter not exceed 20 percent of the amount it collects pursuant to this article.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys deposited in the Court Collection Account pursuant to this section are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for purposes of making distributions pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) For purposes of this section, “pro rata basis” means a distribution determined as follows: the sum of the amounts referred for collection pursuant to Section 19280 to be paid by an offender shall be allocated and distributed in the same proportion that each of the elements has to the sum.

(e) For amounts collected
 pursuant to a restitution fine or restitution order, subdivision (a) is modified to require the deposit and disbursement of funds collected under this article to be in accordance with the laws relating to reimbursement of the State Restitution Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 16.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19283.

The Department of Justice, in consultation with the Franchise Tax Board, shall examine ways to enhance the use and effectiveness of this article through integration with the Department of Justice’s Wanted Persons System and shall report the findings and recommendations to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 380, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Collection of Amounts Imposed by CalSavers Retirement Savings Board and Related Appeals  [19285. - 19290.1.]

19285.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “CalSavers Retirement Savings Program” shall have the same meaning as “CalSavers Retirement Savings Program” as described in subdivision (b) of Section 100000 of the Government Code.

(b) “Eligible employer” shall have the same meaning as “eligible employer” as described in subdivision (d) of Section 100000 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 21, Sec. 15.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19286.

(a) (1) Penalties imposed pursuant to Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code, upon an eligible employer for failure to comply with Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code, may be referred by the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board to the Franchise Tax Board for collection under guidelines prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall establish criteria for referral that shall include setting forth a minimum dollar amount subject to referral and collection.

(b) Upon written notice to a noncompliant eligible employer from the Franchise Tax Board, any amount referred to the
 Franchise Tax Board under subdivision (a) shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California, and may be collected from the eligible employer by the Franchise Tax Board in any manner authorized under the law for collection of a delinquent personal income tax liability, except that an overpayment of any liability imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part shall not be credited against any balance due pursuant to this section. 

(c) Any information, information sources, or enforcement remedies and capabilities available to the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board or the state referring to the amount due described in subdivision (a) shall be available to the Franchise Tax Board to be used in conjunction with, or independent of, the information, information sources, or remedies and capabilities available to the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) The activities required to implement and administer this article shall not interfere with the primary mission of the Franchise Tax Board to administer Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(e) A collection under this article is not a payment of income taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 21, Sec. 15.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19287.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall issue a first notice of the imposition of a penalty for noncompliance with Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code to an eligible employer after the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board informs the Franchise Tax Board of the eligible employer’s noncompliance

(b) Unless an appeal is filed pursuant to Section 19288, within 90 days after the issuance of the first notice, as provided in subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board shall issue a second notice of the imposition of a penalty for noncompliance under Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code to an eligible employer. 

(c) If an appeal is filed
 pursuant to Section 19288, within 90 days after a determination by the Franchise Tax Board sustaining the penalty, the Franchise Tax Board shall issue a second notice of the imposition of a penalty for noncompliance under Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code to an eligible employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 21, Sec. 15.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19288.

(a) Within 90 days after the issuance of the notice described in subdivision (a) of Section 19287, an eligible employer may appeal the imposition of a penalty for noncompliance under Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall hear and determine an eligible employer’s appeal of the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board’s imposition of a penalty as provided in Government Code Section 100033.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board, upon the conclusion of the appeal shall notify the eligible employer and the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board of its determination in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 21, Sec. 15.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19289.

Amounts collected under this article shall be transmitted to the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board for deposit in the CalSavers Retirement Savings Trust pursuant to Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code, or remitted by means of the Fi$Cal accounting system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 21, Sec. 15.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19290.

The Franchise Tax Board shall seek additional resources needed to accept referrals from CalSavers Retirement Savings Board pursuant to Section 19286.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 21, Sec. 15.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19290.1.

The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this article. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any regulation adopted by the Franchise Tax Board, pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 21, Sec. 15.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Collection of Tax Debts Due to the Internal Revenue Service or Other States [19291. - 19291.]

19291.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may enter into an agreement to collect any delinquent tax debt due to the Internal Revenue Service or any other state imposing an income tax or tax measured by income if, pursuant to Section 19377.5, the Internal Revenue Service or that state has entered into an agreement to collect delinquent tax debts due the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) Upon written notice to the debtor from the Franchise Tax Board, any amount referred to the Franchise Tax Board under subdivision (a) shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California, and shall be collected from the debtor by the Franchise Tax Board in any manner authorized under the law for collection of a delinquent income tax liability, including, but not limited to, the recording of a notice of state tax lien under Article 2 (commencing with Section 7170) of Chapter 14 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and the issuance of an order and levy under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for earnings withholding orders for taxes.

(c) Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), and Part 11
 (commencing with Section 23001) shall apply to amounts referred under this section in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if the language of those laws had been incorporated in full into this section, except to the extent that any provision is either inconsistent with this section or is not relevant to this section.

(d) The activities required to implement and administer this section shall not interfere with the primary mission of the Franchise Tax Board to administer Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(e) In no event shall a collection under this section be construed as a payment of income taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), a penalty imposed under Part 32 (commencing with Section 61000), or a premium assistance subsidy
 under Title 25 (commencing with Section 100800) of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 38.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Collection of Recaptured California Small Business COVID-19 Relief Grants [19294. - 19295.]

19294.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “CalOSBA” or “office” means the Office of Small Business Advocate within the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.

(2) “Recaptured grant amount” means the amount identified in any recommendation for recapture of a grant approved, in whole or in part, by CalOSBA.

(b) CalOSBA shall provide to the Franchise Tax Board a list of grantees and their respective recaptured grant amounts as approved, in whole or in part, by CalOSBA pursuant to Section 12100.82.5 or 12100.91.5 of the Government Code for collection.

(c) Any recaptured grant amount shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California, and shall be collected from the grantee by the Franchise Tax Board in any manner authorized under the law for collection of a delinquent personal income tax liability, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order and levy under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for earnings withholding orders for taxes, and any overpayment of any liability imposed under this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall be credited against any balance due pursuant to this section.

(d) The Controller may, in the Controller’s discretion, offset any amount due a grantee by a state agency against any recaptured grant amount pursuant
 to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12410) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) This part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall apply to amounts provided to the Franchise Tax Board under this section in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if the language of those laws had been incorporated in full into this article, except to the extent that any provision is either inconsistent with this article or is not relevant to this article.

(f) For amounts that CalOSBA provided to the Franchise Tax Board for collection under subdivision (b), interest shall accrue at the greater of the rate applicable to the amount due being collected or the rate provided under Section 19521. When notice of the amount due includes
 interest and is mailed to the grantee and the amount is paid within 15 days after the date of notice, interest shall not be imposed for the period after the date of notice.

(g) Any information, information sources, or enforcement remedies and capabilities available to CalOSBA or the state with respect to the recaptured grant amount described in subdivision (b) shall be available to the Franchise Tax Board to be used in conjunction with, or independent of, the information, information sources, or remedies and capabilities available to the Franchise Tax Board.

(h) The activities required to implement and administer this article shall not interfere with the primary mission of the Franchise Tax Board to administer Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(i) A
 collection under this article is not a payment of income taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 7, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 256, Sec. 17.   (AB 176)   Effective September 23, 2021.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 19295.)
-------------------------------------------

19295.

This article shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 7, Sec. 3.   (SB 87)   Effective February 23, 2021.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 8, commencing  with Section 19294.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.1. Collection of Recaptured California Small Business and Nonprofit COVID-19 Supplemental Paid Sick Leave Relief Grants [19295.1. - 19295.2.]

19295.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, all the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “California Small Business and Nonprofit COVID-19 Supplemental Paid Sick Leave Relief Grant Program” or “program” means the grant program established under Article 9.1 (commencing with Section 12100.96) of Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) “GO-Biz” or “office” means the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.

(3) “Recaptured grant amount” means the amount identified in any recommendation for recapture of a grant approved, in whole or in part, by GO-Biz.

(b) GO-Biz shall provide to the Franchise Tax Board a list of grantees and their respective recaptured grant amounts as approved, in whole or in part, by GO-Biz pursuant to Section 12100.97 of the Government Code for collection.

(c) Any recaptured grant amount shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California, and shall be collected from the grantee by the Franchise Tax Board in any manner authorized under the law for collection of a delinquent personal income tax liability, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order and levy under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for earnings withholding orders for taxes, and any overpayment of any liability imposed under this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11
 (commencing with Section 23001) shall be credited against any balance due pursuant to this section.

(d) The Controller may, in the Controller’s discretion, offset any amount due a grantee by a state agency against any recaptured grant amount pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12410) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) This part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall apply to amounts provided to the Franchise Tax Board under this section in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if the language of those laws had been incorporated in full into this article, except to the extent that any provision is either inconsistent with this article or is not
 relevant to this article.

(f) For amounts that GO-Biz provided to the Franchise Tax Board for collection under subdivision (b), interest shall accrue at the greater of the rate applicable to the amount due being collected or the rate provided under Section 19521. When notice of the amount due includes interest and is mailed to the grantee and the amount is paid within 15 days after the date of notice, interest shall not be imposed for the period after the date of notice.

(g) Any information, information sources, or enforcement remedies and capabilities available to GO-Biz or the state with respect to the recaptured grant amount described in subdivision (b) shall be available to the Franchise Tax Board to be used in conjunction with, or independent of, the information, information sources, or remedies and capabilities available to the
 Franchise Tax Board.

(h) The activities required to implement and administer this article shall not interfere with the primary mission of the Franchise Tax Board to administer Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(i) A collection under this article is not a payment of income taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 736, Sec. 5.   (AB 152)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 19295.2.)
-------------------------------------------

19295.2.

This article shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 736, Sec. 5.   (AB 152)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 8.1, commencing with Section 19295.1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Collection of Recaptured California Competes Grants [19296. - 19298.]

19296.

For purposes of this article, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “California Competes Grant Program” means the program that authorizes the grants allowed under Article 4.4 (commencing with Section 12096.6) of Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) “Committee” means the California Competes Tax Credit Committee established in Section 18410.2.

(c) “GO-Biz” means the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.

(d) “Qualified grantee” means an applicant for grants the California Competes Grant Program that satisfies the requirements of
 subdivision (b) of Section 12096.6.1 of the Government Code.

(e) “Recaptured grant amount” shall mean the amount identified in any recommendation for recapture of a grant approved, in whole or in part, by the committee pursuant to the California Competes Grant Program and Section 18410.2 of this code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19292 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 256, Sec. 19.   (AB 176)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19297.

(a) GO-Biz shall provide to the Franchise Tax Board a list of qualified grantees and their respective recaptured grant amounts as approved, in whole or in part, by the committee pursuant to Section 18410.2 for collection.

(b) Any recaptured grant amount shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California, and shall be collected from the qualified grantee by the Franchise Tax Board in any manner authorized under the law for collection of a delinquent personal income tax liability, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order and levy under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for earnings withholding orders for taxes, and any
 overpayment of any liability imposed under this part or, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall be credited against any balance due pursuant to this section.

(c) The Controller may, in the Controller’s discretion, offset any amount due a qualified grantee by a state agency against any recaptured grant amount pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12410) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) This part and Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall apply to amounts provided to the Franchise Tax Board under this section in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if the language of those laws had been incorporated in full into this article, except to the extent
 that any provision is either inconsistent with this article or is not relevant to this article.

(e) For amounts that GO-Biz provided to the Franchise Tax Board for collection under subdivision (a), interest shall accrue at the greater of the rate applicable to the amount due being collected or the rate provided under Section 19521. When notice of the amount due includes interest and is mailed to the qualified grantee and the amount is paid within 15 days after the date of notice, interest shall not be imposed for the period after the date of notice.

(f) Any information, information sources, or enforcement remedies and capabilities available to GO-Biz or the state with respect to the recaptured grant amount described in subdivision (a) shall be available to the Franchise Tax Board to be used in conjunction with, or independent of, the information, information sources, or remedies
 and capabilities available to the Franchise Tax Board.

(g) The activities required to implement and administer this article shall not interfere with the primary mission of the Franchise Tax Board to administer Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(h) A collection under this article is not a payment of income taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 this code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19293 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 256, Sec. 20.   (AB 176)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19298.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board and GO-Biz may prescribe regulations as necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this article.

(b) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any regulation, standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board or GO-Biz pursuant to this article.

(c) Except as provided in this article, Section 19542 shall apply to all information obtained by the Franchise Tax Board and GO-Biz for the purpose of administering the California Competes Grant Program.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 19542, the Franchise Tax Board may disclose information to GO-Biz and GO-Biz may disclose information to the Franchise Tax Board to facilitate the collection of recaptured grant amounts under this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19294 (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 74, Sec. 22) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 256, Sec. 21.   (AB 176)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Overpayments and Refunds [19301. - 19443.]



  ARTICLE 1. Claim for Refund [19301. - 19368.]

19301.

(a) If the Franchise Tax Board or the board, as the case may be, finds that there has been an overpayment of any liability imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part by a taxpayer for any year for any reason, the amount of the overpayment may be credited against any amount then due from the taxpayer and the balance shall be refunded to the taxpayer.

(b) In the case of a joint return filed under Section
 18521, the amount of the overpayment may be credited against the amount then due from both taxpayers and the balance shall be refunded to both taxpayers in the names under which the return was paid.

(c) In the case of a corporation, the balance shall be refunded to the taxpayer or its successor through reorganization, merger, or consolidation, or to its shareholders upon dissolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19302.

If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the taxpayer paid an amount not required to be paid under this part, the Franchise Tax Board shall set forth that fact in its records and may either credit the amount on any amounts then due and payable under this part from the taxpayer by whom the amount was paid or refund the amount or the balance to the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s successors, administrators, or executors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 726, Sec. 35.   Effective September 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19303.

The Franchise Tax Board shall revise returns required to be filed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 18501) of Chapter 2 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 to allow a taxpayer, who is an individual, to designate more than one account at financial institutions for direct deposit of the taxpayer’s refund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 90, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19304.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise taxpayer form instructions, for returns required to be filed, pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 18501) of Chapter 2, to include information about the ability of a taxpayer to directly deposit a portion of the refund into the Golden State Scholarshare College Savings Trust or into the California ABLE Program Trust.

(b) The Scholarshare Investment Board shall provide the Franchise Tax Board with a description of the Golden State Scholarshare College Savings Trust on or before a specified date provided by the Franchise Tax Board. The length of the description shall be five lines or less.

(c) The California ABLE Act Board shall provide the Franchise Tax Board with a description of the California ABLE Program Trust on or before a specified date provided by the Franchise Tax Board. The length of the description shall be five lines or less.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the taxpayer form instructions in the most cost-effective manner.

(e) For purposes of this section, “Golden State Scholarshare College Savings Trust” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 69980 of the Education Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “California ABLE Program Trust” has the meaning set forth in Section 4875 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 722, Sec. 1.   (AB 1076)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19306.

(a) No credit or refund shall be allowed or made after a period ending four years from the date the return was filed (if filed within the time prescribed by Section 18567 or 18604, whichever is applicable), four years from the last day prescribed for filing the return (determined without regard to any extension of time for filing the return), or after one year from the date of the overpayment, whichever period expires later, unless before the expiration of that period a claim therefor is filed by the taxpayer, or unless before the
 expiration of that period the Franchise Tax Board allows a credit, makes a refund, or mails a notice of proposed overpayment on a preprinted form prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be applied to all claims and refunds, without regard to taxable year, for which the statute of limitations has not expired on the date that this act takes effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 543, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19307.

For purposes of Section 19306, a return filed within four years from the last day prescribed for filing the return showing a credit allowable by Section 19002 or estimated tax paid pursuant to Section 19023, 19024, or 19136 in excess of the tax due, shall be considered a claim for refund of the excess if the amount thereof is more than one dollar ($1). No refund of tax withheld or estimated tax paid shall be allowed to an employee or taxpayer who fails to file a return for the taxable year in respect of which the tax withheld or
 estimated tax was allowable as a credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19308.

The period within which a claim for credit or refund may be filed, or credit or refund allowed or made if no claim is filed, shall be the period within which the Franchise Tax Board may mail a notice of proposed deficiency assessment under the same circumstances, if either of the following apply:
